Washington statutes.
RCW 38.40.150

Property to remain public property.

All property issued to organizations and members of the organized militia of Washington shall be and remain public property.

[ 1943 c 130 s 38; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8603-38. Prior: 1917 c 107 s 33; 1909 c 134 s 51; 1895 c 108 s 78.]